California statutes. Insurance Code
 limitation referenced in subparagraph (A) shall be equal and limited to the higher of the three-year average annual premiums for the applicable subaccount or account as calculated pursuant to this section.

(C) If the maximum assessment, together with the other assets of the association in an account, does not provide in one year in either account an amount sufficient to carry out the responsibilities of the association, the necessary additional funds shall be assessed as soon thereafter as permitted by this article.

(2) The board may provide in the plan of operation a method of allocating funds among claims, whether relating to one or more impaired or insolvent insurers, when the maximum assessment will be insufficient to cover anticipated claims.

(f) The board may, by an equitable method as established in the plan
 of operation, refund to member insurers, in proportion to the contribution of each insurer to that account, the amount by which the assets of the account exceed the amount the board finds is necessary to carry out during the coming year the obligations of the association with regard to that account, including assets accruing from assignment, subrogation, net realized gains, and income from investments. A reasonable amount may be retained in any account to provide funds for the continuing expenses of the association and for future losses.

(g) It shall be proper for any member insurer, in determining its premium rates and policy owner dividends as to any kind of insurance within the scope of this article, to consider the amount reasonably necessary to meet its assessment obligations under this article.

(h) The association shall issue to each insurer paying an assessment under this
 article, other than class A assessment, a certificate of contribution, in a form prescribed by the commissioner, for the amount of the assessment so paid. All outstanding certificates shall be of equal dignity and priority without reference to amounts or date of issue. A certificate of contribution may be shown by the insurer in its financial statement as an asset in the form and for the amount, if any, and period of time as the commissioner may approve.

(i) (1) Subject to the provisions of paragraph (3), the plan of operation adopted pursuant to Section 1067.09 shall contain provisions whereby each member insurer may recoup over a reasonable length of time a sum reasonably calculated to recoup the assessments with respect to the health insurance account paid by the member insurer under this article by way of a surcharge on premiums charged for health insurance policies to which this article applies. Amounts recouped shall
 not be considered premiums for any other purpose, including the computation of gross premium tax or agent’s commission.

(2) Member insurers who collect surcharges in excess of assessments paid pursuant to this section for an insolvent insurer shall remit the excess to the association as an additional assessment within 120 days after the end of the collection period as determined by the association. The excess shall be applied to reduce future health insurance account assessments for that insurer.

(3) The plan of operation may permit a member insurer to omit the collection of the surcharge from its insureds when it determines the amount of the surcharge collectible from each insured would be unreasonably small in relation to the potential confusion of or objection by the insureds even if the aggregate surcharges collectible from all insureds exceeds the expense of collection.

(j) Any statement of the amount of surcharge provided by the association shall include a description of, and purpose for, the California Life and Health Insurance Guarantee Association, as follows:

 

“Companies writing health insurance business in California are required to participate in the California Life and Health Insurance Guarantee Association. If a company writing health insurance becomes insolvent, the California Life and Health Insurance Guarantee Association settles unpaid claims and assesses each insurance company for its fair share.”

“California law allows all companies to surcharge policies to recover these assessments. If your policy is surcharged, “CA Surcharge” with an amount will be displayed on your premium notice.”

 

(k) (1) A member insurer that wishes to protest all or part of an assessment shall pay when due the full amount of the assessment as set forth in the notice provided by the association. The payment shall be available to meet association obligations during the pendency of the protest or any subsequent appeal. Payment shall be accompanied by a statement in writing that the payment is made under protest and setting forth a brief statement of the grounds for the protest.

(2) Within 60 days following the payment of an assessment under protest by a member insurer, the association shall notify the member insurer in writing of its determination with respect to the protest unless the association notifies the member insurer that additional time is required to resolve the issues raised by the protest.

(3) Within 30 days after a final decision has been made, the association shall notify the protesting member insurer in writing of that final decision. Within 60 days of receipt of notice of the final decision, the protesting member insurer may appeal that final action to the commissioner.

(4) In the alternative to rendering a final decision with respect to a protest based on a question regarding the assessment base, the association may refer protests to the commissioner for a final decision, with or without a recommendation from the association.

(5) If the protest or appeal on the assessment is upheld, the amount paid in error or excess shall be returned to the member company. Interest on a refund due a protesting member shall be paid at the rate actually earned by the association.

(l) The association
 may request information of member insurers in order to aid in the exercise of its power under this section, and member insurers shall promptly comply with a request.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 334, Sec. 8.   (SB 1408)   Effective September 27, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

1067.09.

(a) (1) The association shall submit to the commissioner a plan of operation and any amendments thereto necessary or suitable to ensure the fair, reasonable, and equitable administration of the association. The plan of operation and any amendments thereto shall become effective upon the commissioner’s written approval or unless he or she has not disapproved it within 30 days.

(2) If the association fails to submit a suitable plan of operation within 120 days following the effective date of this article or if at any time thereafter the association fails to submit suitable amendments to the plan, the commissioner shall, after notice and hearing, adopt and
 promulgate those reasonable rules as are necessary or advisable to effectuate the provisions of this article. The rules shall continue in force until modified by the commissioner or superseded by a plan submitted by the association and approved by the commissioner.

(b) All member insurers shall comply with the plan of operation.

(c) The plan of operation shall, in addition to requirements enumerated elsewhere in this article, do all of the following:

(1) Establish procedures for handling the assets of the association.

(2) Establish the amount and method of reimbursing members of the board of directors under Section 1067.06.

(3) Establish regular places and times for meetings including
 telephone conference calls of the board of directors.

(4) Establish procedures for records to be kept of all financial transactions of the association, its agents, and the board of directors.

(5) Establish the procedure whereby selections for the board of directors will be made and submitted to the commissioner.

(6) Establish any additional procedures for assessments under Section 1067.08.

(7) Contain additional provisions necessary or proper for the execution of the powers and duties of the association.

(8) Establish procedures whereby a director may be removed for cause, including in the case where a member insurer director becomes an impaired or insolvent insurer.

(9) Require the board of directors to establish a policy and procedures for addressing conflicts of interests.

(d) The plan of operation may provide that any or all powers and duties of the association, including its administration, except those under paragraph (3) of subdivision (l) of Section 1067.07 and Section 1067.08, are delegated to a corporation, association, or other organization which performs or will perform functions similar to those of this association, or its equivalent, in two or more states. That corporation, association, or organization shall be reimbursed for any payments made on behalf of the association and shall be paid for its performance of any function of the association. A delegation under this subdivision shall take effect only with the approval of both the board of directors and the commissioner, and may be made only to a corporation, association, or
 organization which extends protection not substantially less favorable and effective than that provided by this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 334, Sec. 9.   (SB 1408)   Effective September 27, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

1067.10.

In addition to the duties and powers enumerated elsewhere in this article:

(a) The commissioner shall do all of the following:

(1) Upon request of the board of directors, provide the association with a statement of the premiums in this and any other appropriate states for each member insurer.

(2) When an impairment is declared and the amount of the impairment is determined, serve a demand upon the impaired insurer to make good the impairment within a reasonable time; notice to the impaired insurer shall constitute notice to its shareholders, if any; the failure of the insurer
 to promptly comply with such demand shall not excuse the association from the performance of its powers and duties under this article.

(3) In any liquidation or rehabilitation proceeding involving a domestic insurer, be appointed as the liquidator or rehabilitator.

(b) The commissioner may suspend or revoke, after notice and hearing, the certificate of authority to transact insurance in this state of any member insurer which fails to pay an assessment when due or fails to comply with the plan of operation. As an alternative the commissioner may levy a forfeiture on any member insurer which fails to pay an assessment when due. The forfeiture shall not exceed 5 percent of the unpaid assessment per month, but no forfeiture shall be less than one hundred dollars ($100) per month.

(c) A final action of the board of
 directors or the association may be appealed to the commissioner by a member insurer if the appeal is taken within 60 days of its receipt of notice of the final action being appealed. A final action or order of the commissioner shall be subject to judicial review in a court of competent jurisdiction in accordance with the laws of this state that apply to the actions or orders of the commissioner.

(d) The liquidator, rehabilitator, or conservator of any impaired insurer or insolvent insurer may notify all interested persons of the effect of this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 334, Sec. 10.   (SB 1408)   Effective September 27, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

1067.11.

To aid in the detection and prevention of insurer insolvencies or impairments:

(a) It shall be the duty of the commissioner to do the following:

(1) To notify the commissioners of all the other states, territories of the United States, and the District of Columbia when the commissioner takes any of the following actions against a member insurer:

(A) Revocation of license.

(B) Suspension of license.

(C) Makes a formal order that the company restrict its premium writing, obtain additional contributions to surplus, withdraw from the
 state, reinsure all or any part of its business, or increase capital, surplus, or any other account for the security of policy owners or creditors.

The notice shall be mailed to all commissioners within 30 days following the action taken or the date on which the action occurs.

(2) To report to the board of directors, the Legislature, and the Governor when the commissioner has taken any of the actions set forth in paragraph (1) or has received a report from any other commissioner indicating that any action has been taken in another state. The report to the board of directors, the Legislature, and the Governor shall contain all significant details of the action taken on the report received from another commissioner.

(3) To report to the board of directors when the commissioner has reasonable cause to believe from an examination, whether
 completed or in process, of a member company that the company may be an impaired or insolvent insurer.

(4) To furnish to the board of directors the NAIC Insurance Regulatory Information System (IRIS) ratios and listings of companies not included in the ratios developed by the National Association of Insurance Commissioners, and the board may use the information contained therein in carrying out its duties and responsibilities under this section. The report and the information contained therein shall be kept confidential by the board of directors until that time as it is made public by the commissioner or other lawful authority.

(b) The commissioner may seek the advice and recommendations of the board of directors concerning any matter affecting the commissioner’s duties and responsibilities regarding the financial condition of member insurers and companies seeking admission to
 transact insurance business in this state.

(c) The board of directors may, upon majority vote, make reports and recommendations to the commissioner upon any matter germane to the solvency, liquidation, rehabilitation, or conservation of a member insurer or germane to the solvency of any company seeking to do insurance business in this state. Those reports and recommendations shall not be considered public documents.

(d) The board of directors shall, upon majority vote, notify the commissioner of any information indicating a member insurer may be an impaired or insolvent insurer.

(e) The board of directors may, upon majority vote, request that the commissioner order an examination of a member insurer that the board in good faith believes may be an impaired or insolvent insurer. Within 30 days of the receipt of the
 request, the commissioner shall begin the examination. The examination may be conducted as a National Association of Insurance Commissioners examination or may be conducted by persons that the commissioner designates. The cost of the examination shall be paid by the association and the examination report shall be treated as are other examination reports. In no event shall the examination report be released to the board of directors prior to its release to the public, but this shall not preclude the commissioner from complying with subdivision (a).

The commissioner shall notify the board of directors when the examination is completed. The request for an examination shall be kept on file by the commissioner, but it shall not be open to public inspection prior to the release of the examination report to the public.

(f) The board of directors may, upon majority vote, make recommendations to the
 commissioner for the detection and prevention of insurer insolvencies.

(g) Reports, information, and recommendations from the board to the commissioner and from the commissioner to the board under this section shall be treated as confidential and shall not be considered public documents except as otherwise specifically provided in this section or by specific action of the board or commissioner.

(h) For valuation years ending in 2019 and later, an insurer with long-term care insurance contracts in force covering more than 10,000 lives as of the valuation date shall file disclosure reports with the commissioner and the department’s office of principle-based reserving. The reports shall be in compliance with the long-term care insurance-specific requirements developed in Actuarial Guideline 51 to be incorporated in the National Association of Insurance Commissioners’ Valuation
 Manual. The reports shall be submitted no later than April 1 for the previous calendar year.

(i) On or before April 1, 2019, and on or before each April 1 thereafter, the association shall provide an annual financial report to the commissioner and the chairs of the Senate Insurance Committee and the Assembly Insurance Committee. The report shall include the maximum amount of coverage the association can provide pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (e) of Section 1067.08. The report shall cover the previous calendar year.

(j) Notwithstanding any other law, the commissioner may annually assess a company that issues or renews long-term care policies in an amount up to one million dollars ($1,000,000) based on the insurer’s pro rata share of the costs the department incurs reviewing, analyzing, and reporting on disclosure reports submitted pursuant to
 subdivisions (h) and (i), but not to exceed reasonable regulatory costs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 370, Sec. 215.   (SB 1371)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

1067.12.

(a) This article shall not be construed to reduce the liability for unpaid assessments of the insureds of an impaired or insolvent insurer operating under a plan with assessment liability.

(b) Records shall be kept of all meetings of the board of directors to discuss the activities of the association in carrying out its powers and duties under Section 1067.07. The records of the association with respect to an impaired or insolvent insurer shall not be disclosed to the public prior to the termination of a liquidation, rehabilitation, or conservation proceeding involving the impaired or insolvent insurer, except upon the termination of the impairment or insolvency of the insurer, or
 upon the order of a court of competent jurisdiction. Nothing in this subdivision shall limit the duty of the association to render a report of its activities under Section 1067.13.

(c) For the purpose of carrying out its obligations under this article, the association shall be deemed to be a creditor of the impaired or insolvent insurer to the extent of assets attributable to covered policies reduced by any amounts to which the association is entitled as subrogee pursuant to Section 1067.07. Assets of the impaired or insolvent insurer attributable to covered policies shall be used to continue all covered policies and pay all contractual obligations of the impaired or insolvent insurer as required by this article. Assets attributable to covered policies, as used in this subdivision, are that proportion of the assets which the reserves that should have been established for those policies bear to the reserves that should have been established for
 all policies of insurance written by the impaired or insolvent insurer.

(d) As a creditor of the impaired or insolvent insurer as established in subdivision (c) and consistent with Section 1035.5, the association and other similar associations shall be entitled to receive a disbursement of assets out of the marshaled assets, from time to time as the assets become available to reimburse it, as a credit against contractual obligations under this article. If the liquidator has not, within 120 days of an order directing the liquidation of the business of an insolvent insurer or a final determination of insolvency of an insurer by the receivership court, made an application to the court for the approval of a proposal to disburse assets out of marshaled assets to guaranty associations having obligations because of the insolvency, then the association shall be entitled to make application to the receivership court for approval of its own proposal to
 disburse these assets.

(e) (1) Prior to the termination of any liquidation, rehabilitation, or conservation proceeding, the court may take into consideration the contributions of the respective parties, including the association, the shareholders, and policy owners of the insolvent insurer, and any other party with a bona fide interest, in making an equitable distribution of the ownership rights of the insolvent insurer. In the determination, consideration shall be given to the welfare of the policy owners of the continuing or successor insurer.

(2) No distribution to stockholders, if any, of an impaired or insolvent insurer shall be made until and unless the total amount of valid claims of the association with interest thereon for funds expended in carrying out its powers and duties under Section 1067.07 with respect to the insurer have been fully recovered
 by the association.

(f) (1) If an order for liquidation or rehabilitation of an insurer domiciled in this state has been entered, the receiver appointed under the order shall have a right to recover on behalf of the insurer, from any affiliate that controlled it, the amount of distributions, other than stock dividends paid by the insurer on its capital stock, made at any time during the five years preceding the petition for liquidation or rehabilitation subject to the limitations of paragraphs (2) to (4), inclusive.

(2) No such distribution shall be recoverable if the insurer shows that when paid the distribution was lawful and reasonable, and that the insurer did not know and could not reasonably have known that the distribution might adversely affect the ability of the insurer to fulfill its contractual obligations.

(3) Any person who was an affiliate that controlled the insurer at the time the distributions were paid shall be liable up to the amount of distributions he or she received. Any person who was an affiliate that controlled the insurer at the time the distributions were declared shall be liable up to the amount of distributions he or she would have received if they had been paid immediately. If two or more persons are liable with respect to the same distributions, they shall be jointly and severally liable.

(4) The maximum amount recoverable under this subdivision shall be the amount needed in excess of all other available assets of the insolvent insurer to pay the contractual obligations of the insolvent insurer.

(5) If any person liable under paragraph (3) is insolvent, all its affiliates that controlled it at the time
 the distribution was paid shall be jointly and severally liable for any resulting deficiency in the amount recovered from the insolvent affiliate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 334, Sec. 12.   (SB 1408)   Effective September 27, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

1067.13.

The association shall be subject to examination and regulation by the commissioner. The board of directors shall submit to the commissioner, the Governor, and the Legislature each year, not later than 120 days after the association’s fiscal year, a financial report in a form approved by the commissioner and a report of its activities during the preceding fiscal year. Upon the request of a member insurer, the association shall provide the member insurer with a copy of the report.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 334, Sec. 13.   (SB 1408)   Effective September 27, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

1067.14.

The association shall be exempt from payment of all fees and all taxes levied by this state or any of its subdivisions, except taxes levied on real property.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 974, Sec. 1.7.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

1067.15.

There shall be no liability on the part of and no cause of action of any nature shall arise against any member insurer or its agents or employees, the association or its agents or employees, members of the board of directors, or the commissioner or his or her representatives, for any action or omission by them in the performance of their powers and duties under this article. The immunity shall extend to the participation in any organization of one or more other state associations of similar purposes and to that organization and its agents or employees.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 974, Sec. 1.7.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

1067.16.

All proceedings in which the insolvent insurer is a party in any court in this state shall be stayed not less than 180 days from the date an order of liquidation, rehabilitation, or conservation is final, to permit proper legal action by the association on any matters germane to its powers or duties. As to judgment under any decision, order, verdict, or finding based on default the association may apply to have the judgment set aside by the same court that made the judgment and shall be permitted to defend against the suit on the merits.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 334, Sec. 14.   (SB 1408)   Effective September 27, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

1067.17.

(a) No person, including an insurer, agent, or affiliate of an insurer shall make, publish, disseminate, circulate, or place before the public, or cause directly or indirectly, to be made, published, disseminated, circulated, or placed before the public, in any newspaper, magazine, or other publication, or in the form of a notice, circular, pamphlet, letter, or poster, or over any radio station or television station, or in any other way, any advertisement, announcement, or statement, written or oral, which uses the existence of the California Life and Health Insurance Guarantee Association for the purpose of sales, solicitation, or inducement to purchase any form of insurance covered by the California Life and Health Insurance Guarantee Association Act. Provided, however, that this
 section shall not apply to the California Life and Health Insurance Guarantee Association or any other entity that does not sell or solicit insurance.

(b) (1) The association shall prepare a summary document describing the general purposes and current limitations of the article and complying with subdivision (c). This document shall be submitted to the commissioner for approval. Sixty days after receiving approval, no insurer may deliver a policy or contract described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 1067.02 to a policyholder or contractholder unless the document is delivered to the policy or contractholder prior to or at the time of delivery of the policy or contract. The document should also be available upon request by the policyholder. The distribution, delivery, or contents or interpretation of this document shall not mean that either the policy or the contract or the holder thereof would be covered in
 the event of the impairment or insolvency of a member insurer. The description document shall be revised by the association as amendments to the article may require. Failure to receive this document does not give the policyholder, contractholder, certificate holder, or insured any greater rights than those stated in this article. This paragraph shall remain operative only until paragraph (2) becomes operative.

(2) Within 180 days of the effective date of the act that amended this section in the 2009–10 Regular Session, the association shall prepare a summary document describing the general purposes and current limitations of the article and complying with subdivision (c). This document shall be submitted to the commissioner for approval. At the expiration of the 60th day after the date on which the commissioner approves the document, an insurer may not deliver a policy or contract described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 1067.02
 to a policy or contract owner unless the summary document is delivered to the policy or contract owner at the time of delivery of the policy or contract. The document shall also be available upon request by a policy owner. The distribution, delivery, or contents or interpretation of this document does not guarantee that either the policy or the contract or the owner of the policy or contract is covered in the event of the impairment or insolvency of a member insurer. The description document shall be revised by the association, as amendments to the article may require. Failure to receive this document does not give the policy owner, contract owner, certificate holder, or insured any greater rights than those stated in this article.

(c) The document prepared under subdivision (b) shall contain a clear and conspicuous disclaimer on its face. The commissioner shall promulgate a rule establishing the form and content of the disclaimer. The
 disclaimer shall do all of the following:

(1) State the name and address of the life and health insurance guarantee association and insurance department.

(2) Prominently warn the policy owner or contract owner that the California Life and Health Insurance Guarantee Association may not cover the policy or, if coverage is available, it will be subject to substantial limitations and exclusions and conditioned on continued residence in the state.

(3) State that the insurer and its agents are prohibited by law from using the existence of the California Life and Health Insurance Guarantee Association for the purpose of sales, solicitation, or inducement to purchase any form of insurance.

(4) State that the policy owner or contract owner should not rely on
 coverage under the California Life and Health Insurance Guarantee Association when selecting an insurer.

(5) Provide other information as directed by the commissioner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 426, Sec. 4.   (SB 712)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1067.18.

This article shall not apply to any insurer that was declared to be insolvent or impaired, or as to which delinquency proceedings had been commenced, on or before October 1, 1990.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 975, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

1067.19.

The amendments made to this article by Chapter 334 of the Statutes of 2010 during the 2009–10 Regular Session of the Legislature shall not apply to any member insurer that, before the effective date of those amendments, has been placed under an order of liquidation with a finding of insolvency.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 426, Sec. 5.   (SB 712)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 14.8. Group Enrollment from Health Care Service Plans [1068. - 1068.2.]

1068.

(a) As used in this section, the following definitions shall apply:

(1) “Health care service plan” means any plan as defined in Section 1345 of the Health and Safety Code, but this section does not apply to specialized health care service contracts.

(2) “Carrier” means a health care service plan, an insurer issuing group disability coverage which covers hospital, medical, or surgical expenses, a nonprofit hospital service plan, or any other entity responsible for either the payment of benefits for or the provision of hospital, medical, and surgical benefits under a group contract.

(3) “Insolvency” means that the Director of the Department of Managed Health Care has determined that the health care service plan is not financially able to provide health care services to its enrollees and (A) the Director of the Department of Managed Health Care has taken an action pursuant to Section 1386, 1391, or 1399 of the Health and Safety Code, or (B) an order requested by the Director of the Department of Managed Health Care or the Attorney General has been issued by the superior court under Section 1392, 1393, or 1394.1 of the Health and Safety Code.

(b) In the event of the insolvency of a health care service plan, upon order of the commissioner which shall be issued following his or her receipt of a notice issued by the Director of the Department of Managed Health Care pursuant to Section 1394.7 of the Health and Safety Code, any insurer, nonprofit hospital service plan, and any other entity, other than a health care service plan, responsible for either the payment of benefits for or the provision of hospital, medical, and surgical benefits under a group contract, that participated in the enrollment process with the insolvent health care service plan at the last regular open enrollment period of a group, shall offer enrollees of the group in the insolvent health care service plan a 30-day enrollment period commencing upon the date of insolvency. Each such carrier shall offer enrollees of the group in the insolvent health care service plan the same coverages and rates that it offered to enrollees of the group at the last regular open enrollment period of the group.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 857, Sec. 57.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

1068.1.

(a) As used in this section:

(1) “Carrier” means a specialized health care service plan, and any of the following entities which offer coverage comparable to the coverages offered by a specialized health care service plan: an insurer issuing group disability coverage; a nonprofit hospital service plan; or other entity responsible for either the payment of benefits for or the provision of services under a group contract.

(2) “Insolvency” means that the Director of the Department of Managed Health Care has determined that the specialized health care service plan is not financially able to provide specialized health care services to its enrollees and (A) the Director of the Department of Managed Health Care has taken an action pursuant to Section 1386, 1391, or 1399 of the Health and Safety Code, or (B) an order requested by the commissioner or the Attorney General has been issued by the superior court under Section 1392, 1393, or 1394.1 of the Health and Safety Code.

(3) “Specialized health care service plan” means any plan authorized to issue only specialized health care service plan contracts as defined in Section 1345 of the Health and Safety Code.

(b) In the event of the insolvency of a specialized health care service plan, upon order of the commissioner which shall be issued following his or her receipt of a notice issued by the Director of the Department of Managed Health Care pursuant to Section 1394.8 of the Health and Safety Code, all carriers that participated in the enrollment process with the insolvent specialized health care service plan at a group’s last regular open enrollment period for the same type of specialized health care service benefits shall offer the group’s enrollees in the insolvent specialized health care service plan a 30-day enrollment period commencing upon the date of insolvency. Each such carrier shall offer enrollees of the insolvent specialized health care service plan the same specialized coverage and rates that it had offered to the enrollees of the group at its last regular open enrollment period.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 857, Sec. 58.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

1068.2.

(a) The commissioner shall have the administrative authority to assess penalties against any person, including a natural person or other entity, for violations of this article.

(b) Upon a showing of a violation of this article in any civil action, a court may also assess the penalties prescribed in this section.

(c) Whenever the commissioner has reasonable cause to believe or determines after a public hearing that any person has violated this article he or she shall make and serve upon the person an notice of hearing. The notice shall state the commissioner’s intent to assess the administrative penalties, the time and place of the hearing, and the conduct, condition or grounds upon which the commissioner is holding the hearing and assessing the penalties. The hearings shall occur within 30 days after the notice is served. Within 30 days after the hearing the commissioner shall issue an order specifying the penalty. The penalties resulting from the hearing shall be paid to the Insurance Fund, but may be spent only when appropriated by the Legislature.

(d) Any person who violates this article is liable for administrative penalties of no less than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000).

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1043, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 15. Withdrawal of Insurers [1070. - 1076.]

1070.

Any insurer, upon payment of the fees and costs therefor and surrender to the commissioner of its certificate of authority, may apply to withdraw from this State. Such application shall be in writing, duly executed, accompanied by evidence of due authority for such execution, and properly acknowledged.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

1070.5.

Whenever an admitted insurer fails to take any step necessary to maintain continuance of its certificate of authority, or whenever the certificate of authority admitting an insurer is canceled or revoked, or whenever an admitted insurer as an entity ceases doing an insurance business in this state for any reason, such insurer shall apply to withdraw as an insurer and shall withdraw as such insurer from this state pursuant to this article. Every certificate of authority hereafter granted is so granted subject to this withdrawal requirement. Acceptance of every such certificate of authority is an agreement by the accepting insurer that it will conform to the provisions of this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1191.)
-------------------------------------------

1070.6.

The withdrawal procedure and fees prescribed by this article shall not be required of a nonsurviving admitted constituent to a merger or consolidation into another admitted insurer in accordance with the applicable statutes and the commissioner’s prior written consent given pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 1011, provided the commissioner is satisfied by documents, authenticated so as to be admissible in evidence over objection, filed with him or her, that:

(a) The constituent has discharged all of its liabilities to residents of this state in the manner provided by Section 1071.5;

(b) There will be an admitted insurer directly available to the constituent’s
 policyholders: (1) to obtain policy changes and
 endorsements, (2) to receive payment of premiums and refund unearned premiums, (3) to serve notice of claim, proof of loss, summons, process, and other papers, and (4) for purposes of suit;

(c) The constituent shall timely file with the commissioner appropriate financial statements reporting its insurance business done in this state during the calendar year of the merger or consolidation and all appropriate tax returns required by law for the period, and shall timely pay all taxes found to be due on account of the business; and

(d) The constituent has surrendered its current California certificate of authority to the commissioner for cancellation as of the effective date of the merger.

The withdrawal procedure and fees
 prescribed by this article shall not be required of an insurer that has been liquidated by a final order of a court of record of this or any sister state provided a certified copy of the order reciting the fact of liquidation and discharge of all obligations has been filed with the commissioner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 321, Sec. 11.   (AB 1391)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

1071.
